California statutes. Labor Code
(a) Notwithstanding Section 340 of the Code of Civil Procedure, an action to collect any civil penalty, fee, or penalty fee under this division shall be commenced within three years from the date the penalty or fee became final.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall only apply to penalty assessments or fees for which the three-year period prescribed in this section for the commencement of an action to collect a civil penalty or fee has not expired on the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 998, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6652.

The division shall provide the Contractors’ State License Board with a certified copy of every notice of civil penalty deemed to be a final order pursuant to Section 6601 or after the exhaustion of all other review procedures pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6600) when both of the following have occurred:

(a) The employer served with the notice of civil penalty is, or is thought to be, a licensee licensed by the Contractors’ State License Board. 

(b) The employer referred to in subdivision (a) has failed to pay the civil penalty after a period of 60 days following that employer’s receipt of the notice of civil penalty. 

(c) When the employer has paid the civil penalty referenced in the certified copy of notice of civil penalty that was provided to the Contractors’ State License Board, including all interest owed thereon, then the division shall provide to the employer who was the subject of the certified copy of notice a written confirmation or receipt stating that the employer has paid the amount owed that was the subject of the certified notice provided to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1210, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Miscellaneous Safety Provisions [6700. - 6725.]

6700.

(a) Any employer who causes or allows the use of any flammable or combustible material for the installation acceptance pressure test of any gas houseline or piping shall be conclusively presumed to be maintaining an unsafe place of employment.

(b) Any employer who causes or allows gas pipelines to be tested with gas at pressures in excess of that permitted by applicable sections of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Code for Pressure Piping shall be conclusively presumed to be maintaining an unsafe place of employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

It shall be the duty of the standards board to determine by the maximum allowable standards of emissions of contaminants from portable and from mobile internal combustion engines used inside factories, manufacturing plants, warehouses, buildings and other enclosed structures, which standards are compatible with the safety and health of employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

All portable and all mobile internal combustion engines that are used inside factories, manufacturing plants, warehouses, buildings and other enclosed structures shall be equipped with a certified exhaust purifier device after the certification of the device by the State Air Resources Board.

The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

6703.

Sections 6701 and 6702 shall apply to all portable and all mobile internal combustion engines used inside factories, manufacturing plants, warehouses, buildings and other enclosed structures unless the operation of such an engine used inside a particular factory, plant, warehouse, building or enclosed structure does not result in harmful exposure to concentrations of dangerous gases or fumes in excess of maximum acceptable concentrations as determined by the standards board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

6704.

All crawler and wheel cranes with cable-controlled booms and with rated lifting capacity of more than 10 tons sold or operated in this state shall be equipped with boomstops that meet standards that shall be established therefor by the standards board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6705.

No contract for public works involving an estimated expenditure in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), for the excavation of any trench or trenches five feet or more in depth, shall be awarded unless it contains a clause requiring submission by the contractor and acceptance by the awarding body or by a registered civil or structural engineer, employed by the awarding body, to whom authority to accept has been delegated, in advance of excavation, of a detailed plan showing the design of shoring, bracing, sloping, or other provisions to be made for worker protection from the hazard of caving ground during the excavation of such trench or trenches. If such plan varies from the shoring system standards, the plan shall be prepared by a registered civil or structural engineer.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to allow the use of a shoring, sloping, or protective system less effective than that required by the Construction Safety Orders.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose tort liability on the awarding body or any of its employees.

The terms “public works” and “awarding body”, as used in this section, shall have the same meaning as in Sections 1720 and 1722, respectively, of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6705.5.

Regulations of the department requiring the shoring, bracing, or sloping of excavations, or which contain similar requirements for excavations, shall only apply to the excavation of swimming pools where a reasonable examination by a qualified person reveals recognizable conditions which would expose employees to injury from possible moving ground. If these conditions are found to exist with respect to a swimming pool excavation, employees shall not be permitted to enter the excavation until the condition is abated or otherwise no longer exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 815, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6706.

For the purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 6500, only one permit shall be required for a project involving several trenches or excavations. The provisions of Section 6500 shall not apply to the construction of trenches or excavations for the purpose of performing emergency repair work to underground facilities, or the construction of swimming pools, or the construction of “graves” as defined in Section 7014 of the Health and Safety Code or to the construction or final use of excavations or trenches where the construction or final use does not require a person to descend into the excavations or trenches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6707.

Whenever the state, a county, city and county, or city issues a call for bids for the construction of a pipeline, sewer, sewage disposal system, boring and jacking pits, or similar trenches or open excavations, which are five feet or deeper, such call shall specify that each bid submitted in response thereto shall contain, as a bid item, adequate sheeting, shoring, and bracing, or equivalent method, for the protection of life or limb, which shall conform to applicable safety orders. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose tort liability on the body awarding the contract or any of its employees. This section shall not apply to contracts awarded pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14250) of Part 5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6708.

Every contractor on a construction project, including but not limited to any public works, shall maintain adequate emergency first aid treatment for his employees. As used in this section, “adequate” shall be construed to mean sufficient to comply with the Federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (P.L. 91-596).

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6709.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that Valley Fever is caused by a microscopic fungus known as Coccidioides immitis, which lives in the top 2 to 12 inches of soil in many parts of the state. When soil is disturbed by activities such as digging, grading, or driving, or is disturbed by environmental conditions such as high winds, fungal spores can become airborne and can potentially be inhaled.

(b) This section applies to a construction employer with employees working at worksites in counties where Valley Fever is highly endemic, including, but not limited to, the Counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, Monterey, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Tulare, and Ventura, where work activities disturb the soil, including, but not limited to,
 digging, grading, or other earth moving operations, or vehicle operation on dirt roads, or high winds. Highly endemic means that the annual incidence rate of Valley Fever is greater than 20 cases per 100,000 persons per year.

(c) An employer subject to this section pursuant to subdivision (b) shall provide effective awareness training on Valley Fever to all employees by May 1, 2020, and annually by that date thereafter, and before an employee begins work that is reasonably anticipated to cause exposure to substantial dust disturbance. Substantial dust disturbance means visible airborne dust for a total duration of one hour or more on any day. The training may be included in the employer’s injury and illness prevention program training or as a standalone training program. The training shall include all of the following topics:

(1) What Valley Fever is and how it is contracted.

(2) High risk areas and types of work and environmental conditions during which the risk of contracting Valley Fever is highest.

(3) Personal risk factors that may create a higher risk for some individuals, including pregnancy, diabetes, having a compromised immune system due to causes including, but not limited to, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS), having received an organ transplant, or taking immunosuppressant drugs such as corticosteroids or tumor necrosis factor inhibitors.

(4) Personal and environmental exposure prevention methods that may include, but are not limited to, water-based dust suppression, good hygiene when skin and clothing is soiled by dust, limiting contamination of drinks and food, working upwind from dusty areas when feasible, wet cleaning dusty
 equipment when feasible, and wearing a respirator when exposure to dust cannot be avoided.

(5) The importance of early detection, diagnosis, and treatment to help prevent the disease from progressing. Early diagnosis and treatment are important because the effectiveness of medication is greatest in early stages of the disease.

(6) Recognizing common signs and symptoms of Valley Fever, which include fatigue, cough, fever, shortness of breath, headache, muscle aches or joint pain, rash on upper body or legs, and symptoms similar to influenza that linger longer than usual.

(7) The importance of reporting symptoms to the employer and seeking medical attention from a physician and surgeon for appropriate diagnosis and treatment.

(8) Common treatment and
 prognosis for Valley Fever.

(d) Training materials may include existing material on Valley Fever developed by a federal, state, or local agency, including, but not limited to, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the State Department of Public Health, or a local health department.

(e) In the event that a county which has not been previously identified as being highly endemic is determined to be highly endemic per the annual report published by the State Department of Public Health, this section does not apply in the initial year of that county’s listing in the report. However, this section applies to employers in that county in the year subsequent to the department’s publication that initially identified the county as being highly endemic.

(f) This section applies to an employer whenever employment
 exists in connection with the construction, alteration, painting, repairing, construction maintenance, renovation, removal, or wrecking of any fixed structure or its parts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 225.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6710.

(a) At every place of employment where explosives are used in the course of employment, there shall be a person licensed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7990) of Part 9 of Division 5, to supervise and visually direct the blasting operation.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “explosives” shall include, but not be limited to, class A and B explosives, blasting caps, detonating cord, and charges or projectiles used in the control of avalanches. For the purposes of this section, “explosives” shall not include small arms ammunition or class C explosives such as explosive powerpacks in the form of explosive cartridges or explosive-charged construction devices, explosive rivets, bolts, and charges for driving pins and studs, and cartridges for explosive-actuated power devices.

(c) This section shall not apply to persons, firms, or corporations licensed pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 11 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 958, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6711.

(a) The division shall develop and administer an oral and written examination for persons using explosives, as defined in Section 6710, while engaged in snow avalanche blasting. Any person engaged in snow avalanche blasting shall pass this examination prior to being licensed by the division.

(b) The division shall select an advisory committee to assist the division in preparing the data and information for the written and oral qualifying examination. The advisory committee shall consist of not less than seven members, nor more than nine members, with at least one representative from explosives manufacturers, snow avalanche blasting consultants, the recreational snow ski industry, a public recreation area, the California Department of Transportation, and the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 958, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6712.

(a) The standards board shall, no later than December 1, 1991, adopt an occupational safety and health standard for field sanitation. The standard shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The standard shall be at least as effective as the federal field sanitation standard contained in Section 1928.110 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) The standard shall be at least as effective as California field sanitation requirements in effect as of July 1, 1990, pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 113310) of Chapter 11 of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, Article 1 (commencing with Section 118375) of Chapter 1 of Part 15 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 2441 of this code.

(3) The standard shall apply to all agricultural places of employment.

(4) The standard shall require that toilets are serviced and maintained in a clean, sanitary condition and kept in good repair at all times, including written records of that service and maintenance.

(b) Consistent with its mandatory investigation and reinspection duties under Sections 6309, 6313, and 6320, the division shall develop and implement a special emphasis program for enforcement of the standard for at least two years following its adoption. Not later than March 15, 1995, the division shall also develop a written plan to coordinate its enforcement program with other state and local agencies. The division shall be the lead enforcement agency. Other state and local agencies shall cooperate with the division in the development and implementation of the plan. The division shall report to the Legislature, not later than January 1, 1994, on its enforcement program. The plan shall provide for coordination between the division and local officials in counties where the field sanitation facilities required by the standard adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) are registered by the county health officer or other appropriate official of the county where the facilities are located. The division shall establish guidelines to assist counties that choose to register sanitation facilities pursuant to this section, for developing service charges, fees, or assessments to defray the costs of registering the facilities, taking into consideration the differences between small and large employers.

(c) (1) Past violations by a fixed-site or nonfixed-site employer, occurring anywhere in the state within the previous five years, of one or more field sanitation regulations established pursuant to this section, or of Section 1928.110 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall be considered for purposes of establishing whether a current violation is a repeat violation under Section 6429.

(2) Past violations by a fixed-site or nonfixed-site employer, occurring anywhere in the state within the previous five years, of one or more field sanitation regulations established pursuant to this section, Article 4 (commencing with Section 113310) of Chapter 11 of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, Article 1 (commencing with Section 118375) of Part 15 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, or Section 2441 of this code, or of Section 1928.110 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall constitute evidence of willfulness for purposes of Section 6429.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 6317 and 6434, any employer who fails to provide the facilities required by the field sanitation standard shall be assessed a civil penalty under the appropriate provisions of Sections 6427 to 6430, inclusive, except that in no case shall the penalty be less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for each violation.

(2) Abatement periods fixed by the division pursuant to Section 6317 for violations shall be limited to one working day. However, the division may, pursuant to Section 6319.5, modify the period in cases where a good faith effort to comply with the abatement requirement is shown. The filing of an appeal with the appeals board pursuant to Sections 6319 and 6600 shall not stay the abatement period.

(3) An employer cited pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision shall be required to annually complete a field sanitation compliance form which shall list the estimated peak number of employees, the toilets, washing, and drinking water facilities to be provided by the employer, any rental and maintenance agreements, and any other information considered relevant by the division for a period of five years following the citation. The employer shall be required to annually submit the completed form, subscribed under penalty of perjury, to the division, or to an agency designated by the division.

(e) The division shall notify the State Department of Health Services and the appropriate local health officers whenever a violation of the standard adopted pursuant to this section may result in the adulteration of food with harmful bacteria or other deleterious substances within the meaning of Article 5 (commencing with Section 110545) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) Pending final adoption and approval of the standard required by subdivision (a), the division may enforce the field sanitation standards prescribed by Section 1928.110 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, except subdivision (a) of Section 1928.110, in the same manner as other standards contained in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 383.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6716.

For the purposes of this division, “lead-related construction work” means any of the following:

(a) Any construction, alteration, painting, demolition, salvage, renovation, repair, or maintenance of any building or structure, including preparation and cleanup, that, by using or disturbing lead-containing material or soil, may result in significant exposure of employees to lead as determined by the standard adopted pursuant to Section 6717.

(b) The transportation, disposal, storage, or containment of materials containing lead on site or at a location at which construction activities are performed. “Lead-related construction work” does not include any activity related to the manufacture or mining of lead or the installation or repair of automotive materials containing lead.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1122, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6717.

(a) On or before February 1, 1994, the division shall propose to the standards board for its review and adoption, a standard that protects the health and safety of employees who engage in lead-related construction work and meets all requirements imposed by the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration. The standards board shall adopt the standard on or before December 31, 1994. The standard shall at least prescribe protective measures appropriate to the work activity and the lead content of materials to be disturbed by the activity, and shall include requirements and specifications pertaining to the following:

(1) Sampling and analysis of surface coatings and other materials that may contain significant amounts of lead.

(2) Concentrations and amounts of lead in surface coatings and other materials that may constitute a health hazard to employees engaged in lead-related construction work.

(3) Engineering controls, work practices, and personal protective equipment, including respiratory protection, fit-testing requirements, and protective clothing and equipment.

(4) Washing and showering facilities.

(5) Medical surveillance and medical removal protection.

(6) Establishment of regulated areas and appropriate posting and warning requirements.

(7) Recordkeeping.

(8) Training of employees engaged in lead-related construction work and their supervisors, that shall consist of current certification as required by regulations adopted under subdivision (c) of Section 105250 of the Health and Safety Code and include training with respect to at least the following:

(A) Health effects of lead exposure, including symptoms of overexposure.

(B) The construction activities, methods, processes, and materials that can result in lead exposure.

(C) The requirements of the lead standard promulgated pursuant to this section.

(D) Appropriate engineering controls, work practices, and personal protection for lead-related work.

(E) The necessity for fit-testing for respirator use and how fit-testing is conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 384.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6717.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision in law or regulation, the work performed under any construction contract, including subcontracts thereof, on the Golden Gate Bridge for the Suspension Bridge Seismic Retrofit Project that is awarded after January 1, 2025, and before December 31, 2025, is subject to the lead standards of the construction safety orders, found at Section 1532.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and the general industry safety orders, found at Section 5198 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, that were in effect on December 31, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 23, Sec. 6.   (SB 129)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6717.5.

The division shall submit to the board a rulemaking proposal to revise the lead standards of the general industry safety orders, found at Section 5198 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, and the construction safety orders, found at Section 1532.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, consistent with scientific research and findings. The board shall vote on the proposed changes on or before September 30, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 24, Sec. 34.   (SB 83)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6718.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any test procedures adopted by a state agency to determine compliance with vapor emission standards, by vapor recovery systems of cargo tanks on tank vehicles used to transport gasoline, shall not require any person to climb upon the cargo tank during loading operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 84, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

6719.

The Legislature reaffirms its concern over the prevalence of repetitive motion injuries in the workplace and reaffirms the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board’s continuing duty to carry out Section 6357.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 615, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6720.

By January 1, 2019, the division shall propose to the standards board for the board’s review and adoption a standard that minimizes heat-related illness and injury among workers working in indoor places of employment. The standard shall be based on environmental temperatures, work activity levels, and other factors. In developing the standard, the division shall take into consideration heat stress and heat strain guidelines in
 the 2016 Threshold Limit Values and Biological Exposure Indices developed by the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists. This section does not prohibit the division from proposing, or the standards board from adopting, a standard that limits the application of high heat provisions to certain industry sectors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 839, Sec. 1.   (SB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6721.

(a) The heat illness prevention standards set forth in Section 3395 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations shall be known, and may be cited, as the Maria Isabel Vasquez Jimenez heat illness standard.

(b) The division, before December 1, 2025, shall submit to the standards board a rulemaking proposal to consider revising Section 3395 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations and Section 5141.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. In preparing the proposed regulations, the division shall consider revising the following:

(1) The heat illness standard in subdivision (a), to do the following:

(A) Require employers to distribute a copy of the Heat Illness Prevention Plan to all new employees upon hire and upon training required by Section 3395 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, but no more than twice per year to each employee.

(B) Require employers to distribute a copy of the Heat Illness Prevention Plan to all employees at least once on an annual basis.

(2) With
 regard to farmworkers, the wildfire smoke standards set forth in Section 5141.1 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, to reduce the AQI threshold for PM2.5 at which control by respiratory protective equipment becomes mandatory for farmworkers to, at a maximum, an AQI of 301 or more. The proposed threshold may be lower than 301 AQI or more, as determined by the division. For an AQI above
 301, the employer need not implement fit testing and medical evaluations or otherwise implement requirements under Section 5144 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) The standards board shall review the proposed changes and
 consider adopting revised standards for the standards described in subdivision (b) on or before December 31, 2025.

(d) The division shall consider developing regulations, or revising existing regulations, related to additional protections related to acclimatization to higher temperatures, especially following an absence of a week or more from working in ultrahigh heat settings, including after an illness.

(e) As used in this section:

(1) “AQI” means air quality index. 

(2) “PM2.5” means solid particles and liquid droplets suspended in air, known as particulate matter, with an aerodynamic diameter of 2.5 micrometers or
 smaller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   (AB 2243)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6722.

(a) (1) The standards board, before December 1, 2025, shall draft a rulemaking proposal to consider revising Section 1526 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations to require at least one
 single-user toilet facility on all construction jobsites, designed for employees who self-identify as female or nonbinary.

(2) The standards board shall consider adopting revised standards for the standards described in paragraph (1) on or before December 31,
 2025. 

(b) A construction jobsite described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be subject to the requirements set forth in Section 118600 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 529, Sec. 3.   (AB 521)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6723.

(a) The division, before December 1, 2027, shall submit a draft rulemaking proposal to revise
 Sections 1512 and 3400 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations to require first aid materials in a workplace to include naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to reverse opioid overdose and instructions for using the opioid antagonist.

(b) The division, in drafting the rulemaking proposal, shall consider, and provide guidance to employers on, proper storage of the opioid antagonist in accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions.

(c) The standards board shall consider for adoption revised standards for the
 standards described in this section on or before
 December 1, 2028. 

(d) (1) An individual who administers naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to reverse opioid overdose in a suspected opioid overdose emergency shall not be liable for civil damages as provided in Section 1799.113 of the Health and Safety Code if the conditions in that section are met.

(2) In accordance with paragraph (1), an individual who is licensed as part of a local emergency medical services agency shall not be held responsible for administering nasal naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to reverse opioid overdose, regardless of whether the individual was certified for that activity, unless the individual was acting as a paid first responder at the time of the
 action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   (AB 1976)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6725.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) The term “agricultural employee” means a person employed in any of the following:

(A) An agricultural occupation, as defined in Wage Order No. 14 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(B) An industry preparing agricultural products for the market, on the farm, as defined in Wage Order No. 13 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(C) An industry handling products after harvest, as defined in Wage
 Order No. 8 of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(2) “Guidance Documents” means the following documents available on the division’s internet website:

(A) Cal/OSHA Interim General Guidelines on Protecting Workers from COVID-19.

(B) Cal/OSHA Safety and Health Guidance: COVID-19 Infection Prevention for Agricultural Employers and Employees.

(C) COVID-19 Industry Guidance: Food Packing and Processing, issued by the division, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(D) COVID-19 Industry Guidance: Agriculture and Livestock, issued by the division, the State
 Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(E) Any other guidance or guidelines made available on the division’s internet website pertaining to novel coronavirus
 (COVID-19) infection prevention for agricultural employees.

(b) Commencing on the effective date of this section, the division shall disseminate, in both English and Spanish, information on best practices for COVID-19 infection prevention, consistent with the Guidance Documents. The information shall be designed to be easily understood by agricultural employees from a variety of ethnic and cultural backgrounds, including by using pictograms. The information shall, where possible, provide contact information for the division that employees can use to report workplace safety complaints. The information shall be made widely and easily accessible, including in both digital and physical formats and via the division’s internet website.

 (c) The division, working
 collaboratively with community
 organizations and organizations representing employees and employers, shall conduct a statewide outreach campaign, targeted at agricultural employees, to assist with the statewide dissemination of the best practices information described in subdivision (b) and to educate employees on any COVID-19-related employment benefits to which they are entitled, including access to paid sick leave and workers’ compensation. The campaign shall include, but shall not be limited to, public service announcements on local Spanish radio stations and the distribution of workplace signs. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize access to the worksite by an individual who is not employed by the division.

(d) The division shall routinely compile and report, via its internet website, information relating to the subject matter,
 findings, and results of any investigation by the division relating to practices or conditions prescribed in the Guidance
 Documents or a COVID-19 illness or injury at a workplace of agricultural employees. This information shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Across all investigations, statistical information, including, but not limited to, the number of investigations in each county.

(2) For each investigation, summary descriptive information.

(3) For each investigation, a description of the division’s response, including, but not limited to, whether the response involved an onsite inspection of the facility, a virtual or remote inspection, a letter to the employer, or any other type of action by the division.

(e) This section
 shall remain in effect until the state of emergency has been terminated by proclamation of the Governor or by concurrent resolution of the Legislature declaring it at an end, pursuant to Section 8629 of the Government Code, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 212, Sec. 2.   (AB 2043)   Effective September 28, 2020.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. SAFEGUARDS ON RAILROADS [6800. - 7000.]



  CHAPTER 1. Jurisdiction [6800. - 6802.]

6800.

The division has jurisdiction over:

(a) The safety and health of railroad employees employed in offices and in shops devoted to the construction, maintenance or repair of railroad equipment, and all other railroad employees with respect to occupational health, including, but not limited to, air contaminants, noise, sanitation and availability of drinking water.

(b) The occupational safety and health of employees of rail rapid transit systems, electric interurban railroads, or street railroads.

(c) The safety of employees of all other public utilities as defined in the Public Utilities Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6801.

The jurisdiction vested in the division shall in no instance, except those affecting exclusively the safety of employees, impair, diminish, or in any way affect the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission over the construction, reconstruction, replacement, maintenance, or operation of the properties of public utilities or over any matter affecting the relationship between public utilities and their customers or the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------

6802.

If the division makes or issues any order, decision, ruling or direction under this chapter which, in the judgment of the Public Utilities Commission, unduly and prejudicially interferes with the construction or operation of any public utility affected thereby, or with the public, or with a consumer or other patron of a public utility affected thereby, the Public Utilities Commission, of its own motion, or upon application of any utility or person so affected, may suspend, modify, alter, or annul such order, decision, ruling, or direction of the commission. The action of the Public Utilities Commission shall supersede and control the order, decision, ruling, or direction of the division previously made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 699.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Operation Personnel [6900. - 6910.]

6900.

Notwithstanding Section 6800, the Public Utilities Commission shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2187.)
-------------------------------------------

6900.1.

This Act shall be known and cited as the Railroad Anti-Featherbedding Law of 1964.

(History: Added November 3, 1964, by initiative Proposition 17.   Note: Prop. 17 also includes Section 6900.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6900.5.

It is the policy of the people of the State of California that featherbedding practices in the railroad industry should be eliminated and that national settlement of labor controversies relating to the manning of trains should be made effective in California. Accordingly the award of the Federal Arbitration Board No. 282 appointed by President John F. Kennedy pursuant to Congressional Public Law 88-108 of August 28, 1963, providing for the elimination of excess firemen and brakemen on diesel powered freight trains, or awards made pursuant thereto, shall be made effective in this State. Said award was the culmination of the proceedings originating with the Presidential Railroad Commission which was appointed by President Dwight D. Eisenhower at the request of both railroad labor and management and reported to President Kennedy on February 26, 1962.

Nothing contained in the laws of this State or in any order of any regulatory agency of this State shall prevent a common carrier by railroad from manning its trains in accordance with said award, in accordance with any federal legislation or awards pursuant thereto, or in accordance with any agreement between a railroad company and its employees or their representatives.

(History: Added November 3, 1964, by initiative Proposition 17.   Note: Prop. 17 (the Railroad Anti-Featherbedding Law of 1964) also includes Section 6900.1.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.
